Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.678] CARDIOVASCULAR PRESCREENING FOR STUDENT ATHLETES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Physical examination. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, a qualified licensed health care professional who performs a physical examination for a student athlete must include a cardiovascular prescreening that follows nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations. The prescreening must include but not be limited to the following information on cardiovascular disease: new text end new text begin (1) prior elevated systemic blood pressure, unexplained exertional chest pain or syncope, palpitations, or decreased exercise tolerance; new text end new text begin (2) known cardiac conditions such as arrhythmia syndromes, atrial fibrillation, implanted medical devices, cardiac medication, premature sudden cardiac death, and unexplained drowning or seizures; and new text end new text begin (3) detection of a pathologic heart murmur, irregular rhythm, abnormal pulses, or other findings suggestive of structural or electrical heart disease. new text end new text begin Athletes with positive findings should be referred to a cardiologist for further evaluation and testing. Prescreening must take place no earlier than three months before the start of the athletic season for which the student shall participate in. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Health must compile and publish on the department's website an annual report containing the total number of exams completed and the number of referrals made to a cardiologist. The report must analyze the outcomes of this section and be made publicly available. new text end new text begin (c) The department must monitor and record the total number of screenings, proportion of positive screens and follow-up and, where possible, data regarding the follow-up, including false positive rates, and additional diagnostic studies. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cardiovascular prescreening for all students. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the opportunity for prescreening must be extended to all students and incorporate the cardiovascular prescreening into annual well-child visits to ensure all students receive the prescreening. new text end new text begin (b) Prescreening must be performed by a qualified licensed health care professional and must follow nationally recognized and evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations. new text end new text begin (c) Key prescreening elements must include a targeted personal and family history and focused physical examination to detect or raise suspicion for cardiovascular disease. Prescreening information must include but not be limited to: new text end new text begin (1) prior elevated systemic blood pressure, unexplained exertional chest pain or syncope, palpitations, or decreased exercise tolerance; new text end new text begin (2) known cardiac conditions such as cardiomyopathy, arrhythmia syndromes, atrial fibrillation, implanted medical devices, cardiac medication, premature sudden cardiac death, and unexplained drowning or seizures; and new text end new text begin (3) detection of a pathologic heart murmur, irregular rhythm, abnormal pulses, or other findings suggestive of structural or electrical heart disease. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Education materials for children and families. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Health and the Department of Education must distribute educational materials to children and parents and guardians of students that provide information that follows evidence-based science about medical conditions that can cause sudden cardiac arrest and heart failure. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, each school district must annually distribute the educational materials to parents or guardians of students participating in school sports as part of the students' preparticipation physical examination and completion of athletic permission forms. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Professional education for health care professionals. new text end new text begin The Department of Health must encourage policies, programs, training, and continuing education that increase health care provider knowledge of prescreening guidelines, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) how to complete the cardiovascular risk assessment, including collecting family history and personal reports of symptoms; new text end new text begin (2) how to identify early signs of cardiac arrest and heart failure through physical examination; and new text end new text begin (3) referral procedures for positive findings. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The Department of Health in consultation with the Department of Education must adopt rules pursuant to chapter 14 to implement the purposes of this section using nationally recognized and evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations. new text end